North Carolina, session 2025, SB933.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds beginning
with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to Forsyth Technical Community College to
support the Boost college-to-career program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S933-v-1*